Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2614
License; permit;
stamp; alter; forge; counterfeit; violations; penalty.

Any
person who, with intent to defraud the state, shall make, alter, forge, or counterfeit any license,
permit, stamp, or
cigarette tax meter impression provided for in sections 77-2601 to 77-2615,
or who shall have in his or
her possession any forged, counterfeited, spurious, or altered license, permit, stamp, or cigarette tax meter impression,
with intent to use the same, knowing or having reasonable grounds to believe
the same to be such, or shall have in his or
her possession one or more cigarette stamps or cigarette tax meter
impressions which he or she knows
have been removed from the pieces or packages of cigarettes to which they
were affixed, or who affixes to any piece or package of cigarettes a stamp
or cigarette tax meter impression which he or
she knows has been removed from any other piece or package of
cigarettes shall be deemed guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1947, c. 267, § 14, p. 865;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 236;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 34.